test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kepidem_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: # MLO, checked

  Noun - čuovânem:
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Nom: čuovânem
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Gen: čuovânem
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Acc: čuovânem
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Ill: čuovvânmân
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Loc: čuovvânmist
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Com: čuovvânmáin
    čuovânem+N+Sg+Abe: čuovânemttáá
    čuovânem+N+Ess: čuovvânmin
    čuovânem+N+Par: čuovvânmid
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Nom: čuovvânmeh
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Gen: čuovvânmij
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Acc: čuovvânmijd
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Ill: čuovvânmáid
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Loc: čuovvânmijn
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Com: [čuovvânmijguin, čuovvânmijgijn]
    čuovânem+N+Pl+Abe: čuovvânmijttáá

  Noun - kepidem:
    kepidem+N+Sg+Nom: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Gen: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Acc: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Ill: keeppidmân
    kepidem+N+Sg+Loc: keeppidmist
    kepidem+N+Sg+Com: keeppidmáin
    kepidem+N+Sg+Abe: kepidemttáá
    kepidem+N+Ess: keeppidmin
    kepidem+N+Par: keeppidmid
    kepidem+N+Pl+Nom: keeppidmeh
    kepidem+N+Pl+Gen: keeppidmij
    kepidem+N+Pl+Acc: keeppidmijd
    kepidem+N+Pl+Ill: keeppidmáid
    kepidem+N+Pl+Loc: keeppidmijn
    kepidem+N+Pl+Com: [keeppidmijguin, keeppidmijgijn]
    kepidem+N+Pl+Abe: keeppidmijttáá

  Noun - jámálgem:
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Nom: jámálgem
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Gen: jámálgem
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Acc: jámálgem
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Ill: jáámáálgmân
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Loc: jáámáálgmist
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Com: jáámáálgmáin
    jámálgem+N+Sg+Abe: jámálgemttáá
    jámálgem+N+Ess: jáámáálgmin
    jámálgem+N+Par: jáámáálgmid
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Nom: jáámáálgmeh
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Gen: jáámáálgmij
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Acc: jáámáálgmijd
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Ill: jáámáálgmáid
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Loc: jáámáálgmijn
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Com: [jáámáálgmijguin, jáámáálgmijgijn]
    jámálgem+N+Pl+Abe: jáámáálgmijttáá

  Noun - ovdedem:
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Nom: ovdedem
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Gen: ovdedem
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Acc: ovdedem
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Ill: oovdedmân
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Loc: oovdedmist
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Com: oovdedmáin
    ovdedem+N+Sg+Abe: ovdedemttáá
    ovdedem+N+Ess: oovdedmin
    ovdedem+N+Par: oovdedmid
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Nom: oovdedmeh
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Gen: oovdedmij
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Acc: oovdedmijd
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Ill: oovdedmáid
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Loc: oovdedmijn
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Com: [oovdedmijguin, oovdedmijgijn]
    ovdedem+N+Pl+Abe: oovdedmijttáá

  Noun - suonjârdem:
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Nom: suonjârdem
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Gen: suonjârdem
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Acc: suonjârdem
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Ill: suonjârdmân
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Loc: suonjârdmist
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Com: suonjârdmáin
    suonjârdem+N+Sg+Abe: suonjârdemttáá
    suonjârdem+N+Ess: suonjârdmin
    suonjârdem+N+Par: suonjârdmid
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Nom: suonjârdmeh
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Gen: suonjârdmij
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Acc: suonjârdmijd
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Ill: suonjârdmáid
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Loc: suonjârdmijn
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Com: [suonjârdmijguin, suonjârdmijgijn]
    suonjârdem+N+Pl+Abe: suonjârdmijttáá

  Noun - tálhudem:
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Nom: tálhudem
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Gen: tálhudem
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Acc: tálhudem
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Ill: táálhudmân
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Loc: táálhudmist
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Com: táálhudmáin
    tálhudem+N+Sg+Abe: tálhudemttáá
    tálhudem+N+Ess: táálhudmin
    tálhudem+N+Par: táálhudmid
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Nom: táálhudmeh
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Gen: táálhudmij
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Acc: táálhudmijd
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Ill: táálhudmáid
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Loc: táálhudmijn
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Com: [táálhudmijguin, táálhudmijgijn]
    tálhudem+N+Pl+Abe: táálhudmijttáá

  Noun - väridem:
    väridem+N+Sg+Nom: väridem
    väridem+N+Sg+Gen: väridem
    väridem+N+Sg+Acc: väridem
    väridem+N+Sg+Ill: väärridmân
    väridem+N+Sg+Loc: väärridmist
    väridem+N+Sg+Com: väärridmáin
    väridem+N+Sg+Abe: väridemttáá
    väridem+N+Ess: väärridmin
    väridem+N+Par: väärridmid
    väridem+N+Pl+Nom: väärridmeh
    väridem+N+Pl+Gen: väärridmij
    väridem+N+Pl+Acc: väärridmijd
    väridem+N+Pl+Ill: väärridmáid
    väridem+N+Pl+Loc: väärridmijn
    väridem+N+Pl+Com: [väärridmijguin, väärridmijgijn]
    väridem+N+Pl+Abe: väärridmijttáá

  Noun - sporijedem:
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Nom: sporijdem
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Gen: sporijdem
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Acc: sporijdem
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Ill: spoorijdmân
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Loc: spoorijdmist
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Com: spoorijdmáin
    sporijdem+N+Sg+Abe: sporijdemttáá
    sporijdem+N+Ess: spoorijdmin
    sporijdem+N+Par: spoorijdmid
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Nom: spoorijdmeh
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Gen: spoorijdmij
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Acc: spoorijdmijd
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Ill: spoorijdmáid
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Loc: spoorijdmijn
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Com: [spoorijdmijguin, spoorijdmijgijn]
    sporijdem+N+Pl+Abe: spoorijdmijttáá

  Noun - styeredem:
    styeredem+N+Sg+Nom: styeredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Gen: styeredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Acc: styeredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Ill: styereedmân
    styeredem+N+Sg+Loc: styereedmist
    styeredem+N+Sg+Com: styereedmáin
    styeredem+N+Sg+Abe: styeredemttáá
    styeredem+N+Ess: styereedmin
    styeredem+N+Par: styereedmid
    styeredem+N+Pl+Nom: styereedmeh
    styeredem+N+Pl+Gen: styereedmij
    styeredem+N+Pl+Acc: styereedmijd
    styeredem+N+Pl+Ill: styereedmáid
    styeredem+N+Pl+Loc: styereedmijn
    styeredem+N+Pl+Com: [styereedmijguin, styereedmijgijn]
    styeredem+N+Pl+Abe: styereedmijttáá

  Noun - lasanem:
    lasanem+N+Sg+Nom: lasanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Gen: lasanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Acc: lasanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Ill: lassaanmân
    lasanem+N+Sg+Loc: lassaanmist
    lasanem+N+Sg+Com: lassaanmáin
    lasanem+N+Sg+Abe: lasanemttáá
    lasanem+N+Ess: lassaanmin
    lasanem+N+Par: lassaanmid
    lasanem+N+Pl+Nom: lassaanmeh
    lasanem+N+Pl+Gen: lassaanmij
    lasanem+N+Pl+Acc: lassaanmijd
    lasanem+N+Pl+Ill: lassaanmáid
    lasanem+N+Pl+Loc: lassaanmijn
    lasanem+N+Pl+Com: [lassaanmijguin, lassaanmijgijn]
    lasanem+N+Pl+Abe: lassaanmijttáá

  Noun - komerdem:
    komerdem+N+Sg+Nom: komerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Gen: komerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Acc: komerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Ill: koomeerdmân
    komerdem+N+Sg+Loc: koomeerdmist
    komerdem+N+Sg+Com: koomeerdmáin
    komerdem+N+Sg+Abe: komerdemttáá
    komerdem+N+Ess: koomeerdmin
    komerdem+N+Par: koomeerdmid
    komerdem+N+Pl+Nom: koomeerdmeh
    komerdem+N+Pl+Gen: koomeerdmij
    komerdem+N+Pl+Acc: koomeerdmijd
    komerdem+N+Pl+Ill: koomeerdmáid
    komerdem+N+Pl+Loc: koomeerdmijn
    komerdem+N+Pl+Com: [koomeerdmijguin, koomeerdmijgijn]
    komerdem+N+Pl+Abe: koomeerdmijttáá

  Noun - kiškodem:
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Nom: kiškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Gen: kiškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Acc: kiškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Ill: kiškoodmân
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Loc: kiškoodmist
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Com: kiškoodmáin
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Abe: kiškodemttáá
    kiškodem+N+Ess: kiškoodmin
    kiškodem+N+Par: kiškoodmid
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Nom: kiškoodmeh
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Gen: kiškoodmij
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Acc: kiškoodmijd
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Ill: kiškoodmáid
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Loc: kiškoodmijn
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Com: [kiškoodmijguin, kiškoodmijgijn]
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Abe: kiškoodmijttáá

  Noun - pargeldem:
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Nom: pargeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Gen: pargeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Acc: pargeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Ill: pargeeldmân
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Loc: pargeeldmist
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Com: pargeeldmáin
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Abe: pargeldemttáá
    pargeldem+N+Ess: pargeeldmin
    pargeldem+N+Par: pargeeldmid
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Nom: pargeeldmeh
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Gen: pargeeldmij
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Acc: pargeeldmijd
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Ill: pargeeldmáid
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Loc: pargeeldmijn
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Com: [pargeeldmijguin, pargeeldmijgijn]
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Abe: pargeeldmijttáá

    
